Illinois, session 104th, HB4224.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5adding Section 3-12-17 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-12-17 new)7    Sec. 3-12-17. Committed person; remote work. 8    (a) The Department shall establish a remote work policy 9for committed persons in the Department's custody to allow 10those persons to obtain gainful employment by private, 11approved employers. The remote work policy shall, at a 12minimum, conform to the following provisions.13    (b) To be eligible for remote work, a committed person 14must, at a minimum:15        (1) have received a State of Illinois High School 16    Diploma or an exemption approved by the Department;17        (2) have served at least 30 days of the term of 18    imprisonment in the facility where the committed person 19    will be working remotely;20        (3) be a general population resident;21        (4) completed or is actively participating in 22    vocational or educational programs;23        (5) not be found guilty of a disciplinary violation   HB4224- 2 -LRB104 16557 RLC 29955 b1    involving the use of a computer or access to the Internet, 2    or both;3        (6) not be found guilty of any disciplinary violations 4    within 90 days of submitting the application and not have 5    a disciplinary report pending at the time of submitting 6    the application;7        (7) be eligible to use a computer and eligible to 8    access the Internet, in accordance with Department policy, 9    and be issued a laptop other than a loaner laptop or have 10    access to a computer designated for remote work by the 11    Department; and12        (8) agree to and sign the necessary contracts and 13    terms of conditions in accordance with Department policy 14    regarding remote work programs.15    (c) A committed person is not allowed to work a remote job 16if:17        (1) the committed person's convicted offense, past 18    convictions, or pending charges involve the use of 19    computers, including, but not limited to, financial fraud, 20    pornography using a computer, human trafficking, identity 21    theft, cybercrime, and terrorism;22        (2) the committed person is prohibited from accessing 23    the Internet, prohibited from using an electronic device, 24    or there is a similar prohibition;25        (3) the work involves access to information protected 26    under the federal Health Insurance Portability and   HB4224- 3 -LRB104 16557 RLC 29955 b1    Accountability Act;2        (4) the work involves access to information from the 3    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority;4        (5) the committed person has a sex offense criminal 5    conviction and the work involves working for a school or 6    school district or other employer where the committed 7    person may have access to information about children; or8        (6) the committed person does not have the 9    qualifications required for the position.10    (d) The chief administrative officer shall designate a 11facility community program coordinator, along with staff, to 12oversee the facility's remote work program. The facility 13community program coordinator shall be responsible for, but 14not limited to, the following:15        (1) serving as the primary liaison to employers who 16    are participating or interested in participating in the 17    remote work program and maintaining contact information 18    for all employers;19        (2) ensuring that employers are:20            (A) aware of and compliant with all requirements 21        of the remote work program;22            (B) notified when committed persons cannot perform 23        remote work, such as, but not limited to, when the 24        facility is in a lockdown, when the committed person 25        is terminated from the program, or when the committed 26        person is in the hospital; and  HB4224- 4 -LRB104 16557 RLC 29955 b1            (C) periodically notified regarding a committed 2        person's performance or changes in responsibilities;3        (3) ensuring that a committed person has 2 forms of 4    identification acceptable for employment purposes or a 5    current passport before applying for remote work;6        (4) ensuring that the committed person signs the 7    necessary documents required under the remote work 8    program;9        (5) maintaining copies of all remote work 10    applications, agreements, and related documentation;11        (6) maintaining a list of all current committed 12    persons who are employed in remote work, their job 13    positions, the start and end dates of their employment, if 14    applicable, and their employers; and15        (7) ensuring the facility's remote work program is 16    assessed on an ongoing basis to address any issues that 17    may arise and making recommendations to the facility chief 18    administrative officer and other appropriate staff to 19    improve the process, practice, and policy.20    (e)(1) An employer who hires a committed person for remote 21work is required to:22        (A) follow non-discrimination policies;23        (B) verify the committed person's eligibility with the 24    facility community program coordinator, or other 25    designated staff, before offering the position;26        (C) provide a job description and details of   HB4224- 5 -LRB104 16557 RLC 29955 b1    compensation to the facility community program 2    coordinator, or other designated staff, and update as 3    changes occur;4        (D) agree to allow monitoring of the committed person 5    while working;6        (E) agree to reporting requirements, including 7    providing updates on work performance and any incidents 8    related to remote work;9        (F) ensure that appropriate workers' compensation 10    insurance coverage is in place for the committed person;11        (G) pay for the cost of any ergonomic or adaptive 12    equipment necessary for a committed person's computer or 13    workstation, which must pass security requirements; and14        (H) if the committed person resigns or is terminated 15    from employment, notify the facility community program 16    coordinator or other designated staff.17    (2) All monetary compensation shall be directly deposited 18by the employer into the committed person's Illinois 19Department of Corrections account.20    (3) The employer shall not provide non-monetary 21compensation to a committed person working remotely, except as 22set out in paragraphs (4) through (7) of this subsection.23    (4) All expenses incurred while participating in remote 24work are the responsibility of the employer.25    (5) The employer must be flexible in dealing with facility 26lockdowns and the impact that may have on a committed person's   HB4224- 6 -LRB104 16557 RLC 29955 b1ability to work remotely.2    (6) The employer may offer a committed person other 3benefits including, but not limited to:4        (A) health insurance for dependent coverage only and 5    not to support the committed person's own personal 6    healthcare needs;7        (B) life insurance;8        (C) retirement plans; and9        (D) vacation, sick, and paid time off.10    (7) Regarding compensation, an employer must:11        (A) pay the committed person by direct deposit to the 12    committed person's facility account;13        (B) pay the committed person the same wage as the 14    committed person's non-committed counterparts that work in 15    the same role, have the same tenure, or as otherwise 16    determined by Department policy;17        (C) comply with all applicable State and federal labor 18    laws, including those related to wage and hour 19    regulations;20        (D) unless paying for a limited position, classify the 21    committed person as a W-2 employee; and22        (E) adhere to standard payroll practices, including 23    any required State and federal deductions.24    (f)(1) Prior to beginning to work remotely, a committed 25person is required to sign the Department-issued Remote Work 26Agreement and Conditions contract and the Resident Computer   HB4224- 7 -LRB104 16557 RLC 29955 b1Use or Internet Access Agreement.2    (2) A committed person who is employed remotely shall:3        (A) be aware of the limits of the committed person's 4    training and capabilities and not perform work outside the 5    boundaries and scope of the committed person's expertise;6        (B) not perform outside the scope of the work 7    description for the position for which the committed 8    person is employed;9        (C) resign from any facility-based work assignment if 10    the remote work is anticipated to last at least 3 months; 11    and12        (E) file State and federal tax returns annually.13    (3) A committed person shall pay for obligations, 14including, but not limited to, victim restitution and room and 15board, from the committed person's compensation.16    (g)(1) If applicable, the employment for a remote work 17position shall end when the planned period of employment ends, 18unless extended by agreement of the committed person, the 19employer, and the facility chief administrative officer, or 20his or her designee.21    (2) A committed person who is employed remotely may resign 22from the committed person's job at any time for any reason by 23giving written notice of the committed person's resignation to 24the committed person's employer and to the facility community 25program coordinator, or other designated staff, who shall 26notify all appropriate facility and Department staff.  HB4224- 8 -LRB104 16557 RLC 29955 b1    (3) The resignation shall take effect 2 weeks after 2receipt by the employer and the facility community program 3coordinator, or other designated staff, unless the committed 4person receives permission from the facility community program 5coordinator, or other designated staff, for the resignation to 6take effect sooner. The resignation shall not have any 7negative consequences for the committed person.8    (4) An employer may terminate a committed person who is 9working remotely from the committed person's employment for 10any reason allowed by federal and State law and shall notify 11the facility community program coordinator, or other 12designated staff, who shall notify all appropriate facility 13and Department staff.14    (5) The facility chief administrative officer, or his or 15her designee, shall terminate a committed person who is 16working remotely from the committed person's employment:17        (A) if the committed person is charged with any new 18    crime;19        (B) if the committed person is no longer in general 20    population;21        (C) if the committed person is found guilty of a 22    disciplinary violation;23        (D) if the committed person violates any of the 24    conditions set out by the Department in the Remote Work 25    Agreement and Conditions, regardless of whether the 26    Illinois Department of Corrections staff or the employer   HB4224- 9 -LRB104 16557 RLC 29955 b1    requested or encouraged the committed person to commit the 2    violation; or3        (E) if there exists any reason for which a committed 4    person may be terminated from any work assignment.5    (6) A committed person may be terminated from the 6committed person's remote work employment at any time for any 7reason at the complete discretion of the Director or the 8facility chief administrative officer, or their designees.9    (7) If a committed person is terminated from the committed 10person's remote work employment by the Director or the 11facility chief administrative officer, or their designees, the 12committed person shall notify the facility community program 13coordinator, or his or her designee, and all other appropriate 14staff.15     (h)(1) A committed person may appeal a decision to deny or 16withdraw approval to search for remote work, apply for remote 17work, or accept an offer for a remote work position or a 18decision to terminate the committed person from a remote work 19position by submitting a written letter to the Deputy 20Director, or the Deputy Director's designee, via the U.S. 21Postal Service or certified mail.22    (2) In order to be reviewed, the appeal letter must be 23postmarked within 15 days of when the decision was received by 24the committed person.25    (3) If an appeal is timely, after reviewing the case with 26the facility chief administrative officer, or his or her   HB4224- 10 -LRB104 16557 RLC 29955 b1designee, the Deputy Director, or the Deputy Director's 2designee, shall decide the appeal within 15 days after 3receiving the appeal. When it is sent to the committed person, 4the decision on the appeal, or notation that the appeal was not 5timely, shall be marked as "legal mail" and processed as such 6at the facility where the committed person is housed.7    (4) Upon review of the appeal, the Deputy Director, or the 8Deputy Director's designee, may:9        (A) approve the decision; or10        (B) reverse the decision.11    (5) The Deputy Director, or the Deputy Director's 12designee, shall provide a copy of the appeal and the response 13to the appeal to the facility chief administrative officer, or 14his or her designee, who shall then document the response in 15the Department's resident and client records management 16system.17    (6) The Deputy Director, or the Deputy Director's 18designee, is the final authority on an appeal and there shall 19be no further administrative level of appeal available. 20    (i) Sections 3-12-4 and 3-12-5 do not apply to committed 21persons employed in remote work positions.  22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 231, 2027.